Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Chapter 21. Virginia Resources Authority.
§ 62.1-207.
Liability of Commonwealth, political subdivisions and members of board of directors.

No bonds or credit enhancements issued by the Authority under this chapter shall constitute a debt or a pledge of the faith and credit of the Commonwealth, or any political subdivision thereof other than the Authority, but shall be payable solely from the revenue, money or property of the Authority as provided for in this chapter. No member of the board of directors or officer, employee or agent of the Authority or any person executing bonds or credit enhancements of the Authority shall be liable personally on the bonds or credit enhancements by reason of their issuance or execution. Each bond or credit enhancement issued under this chapter shall contain on its face a statement to the effect (i) that neither the Commonwealth, nor any political subdivision thereof, nor the Authority shall be obligated to pay the principal of, or interest or premium on, the bond or credit enhancement or other costs incident to the bond or credit enhancement except from the revenue, money or property of the Authority pledged and (ii) that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the Commonwealth, or any political subdivision thereof, is pledged to the payment of the principal of or interests or premium on the bond or credit enhancement.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1998, c. 399.

§ 62.1-208.
Authorization, content and sale of bonds and credit enhancements.

The bonds and credit enhancements of the Authority shall be authorized by a resolution of the Board of Directors.

The bonds shall bear the date or dates and mature at the time or times that the resolution provides, except that no bond shall mature more than fifty years from its date of issue. The bonds may be in the denominations, be executed in the manner, be payable in the medium of payment, be payable at the place or places and at the time or times, and be subject to redemption or repurchase and contain such other provisions as may be determined by the Authority prior to their issuance. The bonds may bear interest payable at such time or times and at such rate or rates as determined by the Authority or as determined in such manner as the Authority may provide, including the determination by agents designated by the Authority under guidelines established by it. Bonds may be sold by the Authority at public or private sale at the price or prices that the Authority determines and approves.

The Authority may bring action pursuant to Article 6 (§

15.2-2650

et seq.) of Chapter 26 of Title 15.2 to determine the validity of any issuance or proposed issuance of its bonds or credit enhancements under this chapter and the legality and validity of all proceedings previously taken, or proposed in a resolution of the Authority to be taken, for the authorization, issuance, sale and delivery of bonds or credit enhancements and for the payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on bonds or payments of amounts due under credit enhancements of the Authority.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1985, c. 67; 1998, c. 399.

§ 62.1-209.
Provisions of resolution or trust indenture authorizing issuance of bonds.

Bonds may be secured by a trust indenture between the Authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any bank having the power of a trust company or any trust company within or without the Commonwealth. A trust indenture may contain provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders that are reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the Authority in relation to the exercise of its powers and the custody, safekeeping and application of all money. The Authority may provide by the trust indenture for the payment of the proceeds of the bonds and all or any part of the revenues of the Authority to the trustee under the trust indenture or to some other depository, and for the method of their disbursement with whatever safeguards and restrictions as the Authority specifies. All expenses incurred in carrying out the trust indenture may be treated as part of the operating expenses of the Authority.

Any resolution or trust indenture pursuant to which bonds are issued may contain provisions, which shall be part of the contract or contracts with the holders of such bonds as to:

Pledging all or any part of the revenue of the Authority to secure the payment of the bonds, subject to any agreements with bondholders that then exist;

Pledging all or any part of the assets of, or funds under control of the Authority, including local obligations owned by the Authority, to secure the payment of the bonds, subject to any agreements with bondholders that then exist;

The use and disposition of the gross income from, and payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on local obligations owned by the Authority;

The establishment of reserves, sinking funds and other funds and accounts and the regulation and disposition thereof;

Limitations on the purposes to which the proceeds from the sale of the bonds may be applied, and limitations pledging the proceeds to secure the payment of the bonds;

Limitations on the issuance of additional bonds, the terms on which additional bonds may be issued and secured, and the refunding of outstanding or other bonds;

The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds, if any, the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which any consent may be given;

Limitations on the amount of money to be expended by the Authority for operating expenses of the Authority;

Vesting in a trustee or trustees any property, rights, powers and duties in trust that the Authority may determine, and limiting or abrogating the right of bondholders to appoint a trustee or limit the rights, powers and duties of the trustees;

Defining the acts or omissions which shall constitute a default, the obligations or duties of the Authority to the holders of the bonds, and the rights and remedies of the holders of the bonds in the event of default, including as a matter of right the appointment of a receiver; these rights and remedies may include the general laws of the Commonwealth and other provisions of this chapter;

Requiring the Authority or the trustees under the trust indenture to file a petition with the Governor and to take any and all other actions required under §

15.2-2659

or

62.1-216.1

to obtain payment of all unpaid sums on local obligations owned by the Authority or held by a trustee to which §

15.2-2659

or §

62.1-216.1

shall be applicable; and

Any other matter, of like or different character, relating to the terms of the bonds or the security or protection of the holders of the bonds.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1986, c. 415; 1997, c. 319; 1998, c. 399; 2003, c. 561; 2011, c. 616.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 561 substituted “§

62.1-216.1

” for “§

62.1-217

” in two places in subdivision B 11.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 616 substituted “payment of all unpaid sums on local obligations” for “payment of all sums necessary to cover any default as to any principal of and premium, if any, and interest on local obligations” in subdivision 11.

§ 62.1-210.
Pledge by Authority.

Any pledge made by the Authority shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made. The revenue, money or property so pledged and thereafter received by the Authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such a pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act. Furthermore, the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the Authority, irrespective of whether the parties have notice of the pledge. No recording or filing of the resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds or credit enhancements, the trust indenture securing bonds or any other instrument, including filings under Title 8.9A (§

8.9A-101

et seq.) of the Uniform Commercial Code of Virginia, shall be necessary to create or perfect any pledge or security interest granted by the Authority to secure any bonds or credit enhancements.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1998, c. 399.

§ 62.1-211.
Purchase of bonds by Authority.

The Authority, subject to such agreements with bondholders as may then exist, shall have the power to purchase bonds of the Authority out of any available funds, at any reasonable price. If the bonds are then redeemable, this price shall not exceed the redemption price then applicable plus accrued interest to the next interest payment date.

History.

1984, c. 699.

§ 62.1-212.
Bonds as negotiable instruments.

Whether or not in form and character of negotiable instruments, the bonds of the Authority are hereby made negotiable instruments, subject only to provisions of the bonds relating to registration.

History.

1984, c. 699.

§ 62.1-213.
Validity of signatures of prior members or officers.

In the event that any of the members of the board of directors or any officers of the Authority cease to be members or officers before the delivery of any bonds or credit enhancements signed by them, their signatures or authorized substitute signatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes as if the members or officers had remained in office until delivery.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1998, c. 399.

§ 62.1-214.
Bondholder protection.

Subsequent amendments to this chapter shall not limit the rights vested in the Authority with respect to any agreements made with, or remedies available to, the holders of bonds or the beneficiaries of credit enhancements issued under this chapter before the enactment of the amendments until the bonds, together with all premium and interest thereon, and the credit enhancements, and all costs and expenses in connection with any proceeding by or on behalf of the holders or the beneficiaries, are fully met and discharged.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1998, c. 399.

§ 62.1-215.
Establishment of capital reserve funds.

The Authority may create and establish one or more capital reserve funds and may pay into each capital reserve fund (i) any moneys appropriated and made available by the Commonwealth for the purpose of such a fund, (ii) any proceeds of the sale of bonds of the Authority, to the extent provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of, or the trust indenture securing, the bonds, and (iii) any other moneys which may be made available to the Authority for the purpose of such a fund from any other source. All moneys held in any capital reserve fund, except as hereinafter provided, shall be used solely for the payment when due of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on the bonds or obligations under credit enhancements issued by the Authority secured in whole or in part by such a fund. If, however, moneys in any such fund are ever less than the minimum capital reserve fund requirement established for the fund, the Authority shall not use the moneys for any optional purchase or redemption of bonds. Any income or interest earned on, or increment to, any capital reserve fund due to its investment may be transferred by the Authority to other funds or accounts of the Authority to the extent it does not reduce the amount of the capital reserve fund below its minimal requirement.
A. 1. The Authority may create and establish one or more capital reserve funds and may pay into each capital reserve fund (i) any moneys appropriated and made available by the Commonwealth for the purpose of such a fund, (ii) any proceeds of the sale of bonds of the Authority, to the extent provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of, or the trust indenture securing, the bonds, and (iii) any other moneys which may be made available to the Authority for the purpose of such a fund from any other source. All moneys held in any capital reserve fund, except as hereinafter provided, shall be used solely for the payment when due of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on the bonds or obligations under credit enhancements issued by the Authority secured in whole or in part by such a fund. If, however, moneys in any such fund are ever less than the minimum capital reserve fund requirement established for the fund, the Authority shall not use the moneys for any optional purchase or redemption of bonds. Any income or interest earned on, or increment to, any capital reserve fund due to its investment may be transferred by the Authority to other funds or accounts of the Authority to the extent it does not reduce the amount of the capital reserve fund below its minimal requirement.

The Authority shall not at any time issue bonds or credit enhancements secured in whole or in part by any capital reserve fund, if upon the issuance of the bonds or credit enhancements, the amount in the capital reserve fund will be less than its minimal requirement unless the Authority, at the time of issuance of the bonds or credit enhancements, deposits in the fund an amount which, together with the amount then in the fund, will not be less than the fund’s minimal capital reserve requirement.

In order to assure further the maintenance of capital reserve funds, the chairman of the Authority shall annually, on or before December 1, make and deliver to the Governor and the Secretary of Administration a certificate stating the sum, if any, required to restore each capital reserve fund to its minimal requirement. Within five days after the beginning of each session of the General Assembly, the Governor shall submit to the presiding officer of each House of the General Assembly printed copies of a budget including the sum, if any, required to restore each capital reserve fund to its minimal requirement. All sums, if any, which may be appropriated by the General Assembly for any restoration and paid to the Authority shall be deposited by the Authority in the applicable capital reserve fund. All amounts paid to the Authority by the Commonwealth pursuant to the provisions of this section shall constitute and be accounted for as advances by the Commonwealth to the Authority and, subject to the rights of the holders of any bonds of the Authority or the beneficiaries of credit enhancements of the Authority, shall be repaid to the Commonwealth without interest from available operating revenues of the Authority in excess of amounts required for the payment of bonds, credit enhancements or other obligations of the Authority, the maintenance of capital reserve funds, and operating expenses. In addition, no bonds issued by the Authority to finance a professional sports facility shall be secured by a capital reserve fund.

The Authority may create and establish other funds as necessary or desirable for its corporate purposes.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the power of the Authority to issue bonds or credit enhancements not secured by a capital reserve fund.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1998, c. 399; 2000, c. 790.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 790 added the last sentence in subsection B.

§ 62.1-216.
Purchase and credit enhancements of local obligations.

The Authority shall have the power and authority, with any funds of the Authority available for such a purpose, to purchase and acquire, on terms which the Authority determines, local obligations to finance or refinance the cost of any project. The Authority may pledge to the payment of any bonds all or any portion of the local obligations so purchased. The Authority may also, subject to any such pledge, sell any local obligations so purchased and apply the proceeds of such a sale to the purchase of other local obligations for financing or refinancing the cost of any project or for any other corporate purpose of the Authority.

The Authority shall also have the power and authority to issue credit enhancements, on terms which the Authority determines, to credit enhance local obligations issued to finance or refinance the cost of any project.

The Authority may require, as a condition to the purchase or credit enhancement of any local obligations, that the local government issuing the local obligations covenant to perform any of the following:

Establish and collect rents, rates, fees and charges to produce revenue sufficient to pay all or a specified portion of (i) the costs of operation, maintenance, replacement, renewal and repairs of the project; (ii) any outstanding indebtedness incurred for the purposes of the project, including the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on the local obligations; and (iii) any amounts necessary to create and maintain any required reserve, including any rate stabilization fund deemed necessary or appropriate by the Authority to offset the need, in whole or part, for future increases in rents, rates, fees or charges;

Create and maintain a special fund or funds for the payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on the local obligations and any other amounts becoming due under any agreement entered into in connection with the local obligations, or for the operation, maintenance, repair or replacement of the project or any portions thereof or other property of the local government, and deposit into any fund or funds amounts sufficient to make any payments as they become due and payable;

Create and maintain other special funds as required by the Authority; and

Perform other acts, including the conveyance of real and personal property together with all right, title and interest therein to the Authority, or take other actions as may be deemed necessary or desirable by the Authority to secure payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on the local obligations or obligations to the Authority with respect to any credit enhancement and to provide for the remedies of the Authority or other holder of the local obligations in the event of any default by the local government in the payment, including, without limitation, any of the following:

The procurement of credit enhancements or liquidity arrangements for local obligations from any source, public or private, and the payment therefor of premiums, fees or other charges.

The payment of the allocable shares of the local governments, as determined by the Authority, of any costs, fees, charges or expenses attributable to liquidity arrangements incurred in connection with the issuance of bonds by the Authority to acquire local obligations of one or more local governments. The determination of such allocable shares may be made by the Authority on any reasonable basis.

The combination of one or more projects, or the combination of one or more projects with one or more other undertakings, facilities, utilities or systems, for the purpose of operations and financing, and the pledging of the revenues from such combined projects, undertakings, facilities, utilities and systems to secure local obligations issued in connection with such combination or any part or parts thereof.

The payment of the allocable shares of the local governments, as determined by the Authority on any reasonable basis, of rate stabilization funds established or required by the Authority in connection with the issuance of bonds by the Authority to acquire or provide credit enhancement for local obligations of two or more local governments.All local governments issuing and selling local obligations to the Authority or to be credit enhanced by the Authority are authorized to perform any acts, take any action, adopt any proceedings and make and carry out any contracts with the Authority that are contemplated by this chapter. Such contracts need not be identical among all participants in financings of the Authority, but may be structured as determined by the Authority according to the needs of the contracting local governments and the Authority.To the extent permitted by law for local obligations issued after July 1, 2003, local governments may enter into agreements with the Authority that provide for a local government to consider and make appropriations of any funds or revenue generated from the following: (i) taxes, funds and assessments from service districts created under Chapter 24 (§

15.2-2400

et seq.) of Title 15.2, (ii) funds held by the local government, or (iii) any revenue or funds generated from sources other than property taxes imposed under Chapter 32 (§

58.1-3200

et seq.) or Chapter 35 (§

58.1-3500

et seq.) of Title 58.1 in amounts sufficient to pay all or a specified portion of the amounts set forth in subsection A or to make deposits into the special fund or funds provided for in subsections B and C and to pledge and apply the amounts so appropriated for such purposes.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1985, c. 67; 1998, c. 399; 2003, c. 561.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 561 added the last paragraph.

§ 62.1-216.1.
Investigation by Governor of nonpayments; withholding state funds from nonpaying locality; payment of funds withheld; receipts, reports, etc.

Whenever it appears to the Governor from an affidavit filed with him by the Authority as the purchaser, holder, or credit enhancer of local obligations (regardless of the security therefor) issued by any county, city or town that a payment has not been made on any local obligations, the Governor shall immediately make a summary investigation into the facts set forth in the affidavit. The Authority may, but shall not be required to, file such an affidavit unless the Authority has otherwise contracted to make such filing for the benefit of the holders of any of its bonds or the local obligations credit enhanced by it. The affidavit described in this section may be filed by a trustee to which the Authority has assigned the local obligations or the payment thereon as security for bonds of the Authority under a resolution or trust indenture or otherwise.

If it is established to the satisfaction of the Governor that such nonpayment has occurred, the Governor shall immediately make an order directing the Comptroller to withhold all further payment to the county, city or town of all funds, or of any part of them, appropriated and payable by the Commonwealth to the county, city or town for any and all purposes, until the unpaid sum is obtained. The Governor shall, while the nonpayment continues, direct in writing the payment of all sums withheld by the Comptroller, or as much of them as is necessary, to the Authority, so as to cure, or cure insofar as possible, nonpayment on the local obligations.

The Governor shall, as soon as practicable, give notice of the nonpayment and of the availability of funds with the Comptroller in writing to the Authority. Any payment so made by the Comptroller to the Authority shall be credited as if made directly by the county, city or town and shall be charged by the Comptroller against the first appropriations otherwise payable to the county, city or town as if paid to the county, city or town. The Authority, at the time of payment or at the time of each payment shall receipt for the payment and deliver to the Comptroller all local obligations or other instruments or documents, in a form satisfactory to the Comptroller, evidencing the Authority’s right to receive the amounts satisfied by the payment. The Comptroller shall report each payment made to the governing body of the nonpaying county, city or town and deliver or send by registered mail to the governing body all local obligations, or other instruments or documents received by the Comptroller under the provisions of this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to create any obligation on the part of the Comptroller or the Commonwealth to make any payment on behalf of the nonpaying county, city or town other than from funds appropriated and payable to the nonpaying county, city or town.

History.

1998, c. 399; 2003, c. 561; 2011, c. 616.

Cross references.

As to the collection of money due the Virginia Tobacco Region Revolving Fund, see § 3.2-3115.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 561, in the first paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “by the Authority as the purchaser” for “by or on behalf of the Authority as the,” and inserted “purchased” preceding “held,” and added the last sentence.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 616, in the first paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “city or town that a payment has not been made on any local obligations” for “city or town that the county, city or town has defaulted in its payment of the principal of or premium, if any, or interest on any of its outstanding local obligations purchased, held, or credit enhanced by the Authority,” and in the last sentence, inserted “or the payment thereon”; in the second paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “that such nonpayment has occurred” for “that the county, city or town is in default in the payment of such local obligations or the interest on them” and “until the unpaid sum is obtained” for “until the default is cured,” and in the last sentence, substituted “nonpayment continues” for “default continues” and “nonpayment on the local obligations” for “the default as to the local obligations or interest on them”; in the third paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “nonpayment” for “default,” and in the last sentence, substituted “nonpaying county, city or town” for “defaulting county, city or town”; and in the last paragraph, twice substituted “nonpaying county, city or town” for “defaulting county, city or town.”

§ 62.1-217.
Grants from Commonwealth.

The Commonwealth may make grants of money or property to the Authority for the purpose of enabling it to carry out its corporate purposes and for the exercise of its powers, including deposits to the capital reserve funds. This section shall not be construed to limit any other power the Commonwealth may have to make grants to the Authority.

History.

1984, c. 699.

§ 62.1-218.
Grants to local governments.

The Authority shall have the power and authority, with any funds of the Authority available for this purpose, to make grants to local governments. In determining which local governments are to receive grants, the Department of Environmental Quality, the Department of Health, and the Virginia Waste Management Board shall assist the Authority in determining needs for wastewater treatment facilities, water supply facilities, solid waste treatment, disposal or management facilities, or recycling facilities, and the method and form of such grants.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1992, cc. 378, 887.

§ 62.1-219.
Exemption from taxation.

As set forth in §

62.1-200

, the Authority will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the powers conferred upon it by this chapter. Accordingly, the Authority shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon any project or any property or upon any operations of the Authority or the income therefrom, or any taxes or assessments upon any project or any property or local obligation acquired, credit enhanced or used by the Authority under the provisions of this chapter or upon the income therefrom. Any bonds and credit enhancements issued by the Authority under the provisions of this chapter, the transfer thereof and the income therefrom, including any profit on the sale thereof, shall at all times be free from taxation and assessment of every kind by the Commonwealth and by the local governments and other political subdivisions of the Commonwealth.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1985, c. 67; 1998, c. 399.

§ 62.1-220.
Bonds as legal investments and securities.

The bonds issued by the Authority in accordance with the provisions of this chapter are declared to be legal investments in which all public officers or public bodies of the Commonwealth, its political subdivisions, all municipalities and municipal subdivisions; all insurance companies and associations and other persons carrying on insurance business; all banks, bankers, banking associations, trust companies, savings banks, savings associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business; all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees and other fiduciaries; and all other persons who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the Commonwealth, may invest funds, including capital, in their control or belonging to them. The bonds of the Authority are also hereby made securities which may be deposited with and received by all public officers and bodies of the Commonwealth or any agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth and all municipalities and public corporations for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the Commonwealth is now or may be later authorized by law.

History.

1984, c. 699.

§ 62.1-221.
Deposit of money; expenditures; security for deposits.

All money of the Authority, except as otherwise authorized by law or provided in this chapter, shall be deposited in an account or accounts in banks or trust companies organized under the laws of the Commonwealth or in national banking associations located in Virginia or in savings institutions located in Virginia organized under the laws of the Commonwealth or the United States. The money in these accounts shall be paid by check signed by the Executive Director or other officers or employees and designated by the Authority. All deposits of money shall, if required by the Authority, be secured in a manner determined by the Authority to be prudent, and all banks, trust companies and savings institutions are authorized to give security for the deposits.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A the Authority shall have the power to contract with the holders of any of its bonds as to the custody, collection, securing, investment and payment of any money of the Authority and of any money held in trust or otherwise for the payment of bonds and to carry out such a contract. Money held in trust or otherwise for the payment of bonds or in any way to secure bonds and deposits of money may be secured in the same manner as money of the Authority, and all banks and trust companies are authorized to give security for the deposits.

Subject to the provisions of subsection B hereof, funds of the Authority not needed for immediate use or disbursement, including any funds held in reserve, may be invested in (i) obligations or securities which are considered lawful investments for fiduciaries, both individual and corporate, as set forth in §

2.2-4519

, (ii) bankers’ acceptances, or (iii) repurchase agreements, reverse repurchase agreements, rate guarantee or investment agreements or other similar banking arrangements.

Whenever investments are made in accordance with this section, no director, officer or employee of the Authority shall be liable for any loss therefrom in the absence of negligence, malfeasance, misfeasance or nonfeasance on his part.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1985, c. 67; 1994, c. 684; 1996, c. 77.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the reference to “26-40” was changed to “2.2-4519” to conform to the recodification of Title 64.1 by Acts 2012, c. 614, effective October 1, 2012.

§ 62.1-222.
Annual reports; audit.

The Authority shall, following the close of each fiscal year, submit an annual report on or before December 1 of its activities for the preceding year to the Governor and General Assembly. Each report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement for the Authority during the fiscal year it covers. An independent certified public accountant or the Auditor of Public Accounts shall perform an audit of the books and accounts of the Authority at least once in each fiscal year.

History.

1984, c. 699; 2005, c. 633.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 633, in the first sentence, inserted “on or before December 1” and “and General Assembly”; deleted the former second sentence which read: “The Clerk of each House of the General Assembly may receive a copy of the report by making a request for it to the chairman of the Authority.”

§ 62.1-223.
Liberal construction of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed to the end that its beneficial purposes may be effectuated. No proceedings, notice or approval shall be required for the issuance of any bonds of the Authority or any instruments or the security thereof, except as provided in this chapter. Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, general, special or local, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.

History.

1984, c. 699.